Utah statutes.
72-4-115.   State highways -- SR-91 to SR-97, SR-99, SR-100.

State highways include:

(1)  SR-91.  From Route 15 south of Brigham City; then easterly through Brigham Canyon and Logan to the Utah-Idaho state line near Franklin, Idaho.

(2)  SR-92.  From Ashton Boulevard in Lehi, east through American Fork Canyon to Route 189 in Provo Canyon.

(3)  SR-93.  From the on- and off-ramps on the west side of Route 15, east along the south city limits of Woods Cross to Route 89.

(4)  SR-94.  From Route 70 northeasterly to Thompson.

(5)  SR-95.  From Route 24 east of Hanksville southerly crossing near the confluence of the Dirty Devil and Colorado Rivers to a point 4.3 miles south of Blanding on Route 191.

(6)  SR-96.  From Clear Creek northerly through Scofield to Route 6 near Colton.

(7)  SR-97.  From Route 37 east on 5500 South Street in Hooper to the Hill Air Force Base Northwest gate.

(8)  SR-99.  From Route 15 south of Fillmore northerly through Fillmore to Route 15.

(9)  SR-100.  From Route 99 in Fillmore westerly then northerly to Route 50 west of Holden.



Amended by Chapter 146, 2013 General Session

